Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5443YH (10) 91 md/jh H.F. 2223 DIVISION I 1 ADDITIONAL HOMESTEAD PROPERTY TAX CREDIT 2 Section 1. Section 425.17, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 3 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 4 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) A person filing a claim for credit 5 under this subchapter who has attained the age of eighteen 6 years on or before December 31 of the base year, is domiciled 7 in this state at the time the claim is filed or at the time 8 of the personâs death in the case of a claim filed by the 9 executor or administrator of the claimantâs estate, and 10 if the homesteadâs actual value did not increase for the 11 applicable assessment year as the result of new construction, 12 improvements, or renovations to the property, beyond necessary 13 repairs. 14 Sec. 2. Section 425.23, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 15 by adding the following new paragraph: 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. The tentative credit for a claimant 17 described in section 425.17, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , 18 subparagraph (4), shall be the difference between the actual 19 amount of property taxes due on the homestead during the 20 fiscal year next following the base year minus one hundred 21 four percent of the actual amount of property taxes due on the 22 homestead during the fiscal year immediately preceding such 23 fiscal year, but not less than zero, if the property taxes due 24 on the homestead for both such fiscal years were calculated on 25 an assessed valuation that was not a partial assessment. 26 Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACT. Section 25B.7 shall not 27 apply to this division of this Act. 28 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 29 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 30 or after July 1, 2027. 31 DIVISION II 32 HOMESTEAD CREDIT AMOUNT 33 Sec. 5. Section 425.1, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -1- LSB 5443YH (10) 91 md/jh 1/ 12 H.F. 2223 2. The homestead credit fund shall be apportioned each 1 year so as to give a credit against the tax on each eligible 2 homestead in the state in an amount equal to the actual levy on 3 the first four thousand eight hundred fifty fourteen thousand 4 five hundred fifty dollars of actual value for each homestead. 5 Sec. 6. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 6 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 7 or after July 1, 2027. 8 DIVISION III 9 ELDERLY ADDITIONAL HOMESTEAD PROPERTY TAX CREDIT 10 Sec. 7. Section 25B.7, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2026, 11 is amended to read as follows: 12 b. Low-income property tax credit and elderly and disabled 13 property tax credit pursuant to sections 425.16 through 425.40 , 14 subject to the limitation of section 425.39, subsection 1 , 15 paragraph âbâ . 16 Sec. 8. Section 425.17, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. âClaimantâ means any of the following: 19 (1) A person filing a claim for credit under this subchapter 20 who has attained the age of sixty-five years but who has 21 not attained the age of seventy years on or before December 22 31 of the base year, a person filing a claim for credit or 23 reimbursement under this subchapter who is totally disabled 24 and was totally disabled on or before December 31 of the base 25 year, or a person filing a claim for reimbursement under this 26 subchapter who has attained the age of sixty-five years on or 27 before December 31 of the base year and who is domiciled in 28 this state at the time the claim is filed or at the time of the 29 personâs death in the case of a claim filed by the executor or 30 administrator of the claimantâs estate. 31 (2) A person filing a claim for credit or reimbursement 32 under this subchapter who has attained the age of twenty-three 33 years on or before December 31 of the base year or was a head 34 of household on December 31 of the base year, as defined in 35 -2- LSB 5443YH (10) 91 md/jh 2/ 12 H.F. 2223 the Internal Revenue Code, but has not attained the age or 1 disability status described in subparagraph (1) or the age 2 status and eligibility criteria of subparagraph (3), and is 3 domiciled in this state at the time the claim is filed or at the 4 time of the personâs death in the case of a claim filed by the 5 executor or administrator of the claimantâs estate, and was not 6 claimed as a dependent on any other personâs tax return for the 7 base year. 8 (3) A person filing a claim for credit under this subchapter 9 who has attained the age of seventy sixty-five years on or 10 before December 31 of the base year , who has a household income 11 of less than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty 12 level, as defined by the most recently revised poverty income 13 guidelines published by the United States department of health 14 and human services, and is domiciled in this state at the time 15 the claim is filed or at the time of the personâs death in the 16 case of a claim filed by the executor or administrator of the 17 claimantâs estate. 18 Sec. 9. Section 425.39, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. a. The elderly and disabled property tax credit fund is 21 created. There is appropriated annually from the general fund 22 of the state to the department of revenue to be credited to the 23 elderly and disabled property tax credit fund, from funds not 24 otherwise appropriated, an amount sufficient to implement this 25 subchapter for credits for property taxes due for claimants 26 described in section 425.17, subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , 27 subparagraphs subparagraph (1) and (3), subject to paragraph 28 âbâ . There is appropriated annually from the taxpayer relief 29 fund under section 8.57E to the department of revenue to be 30 credited to the elderly and disabled property tax credit fund, 31 from funds not otherwise appropriated, an amount sufficient 32 to implement this subchapter for credits for property taxes 33 due for claimants described in section 425.17, subsection 2, 34 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3). 35 -3- LSB 5443YH (10) 91 md/jh 3/ 12 H.F. 2223 b. Regardless of the amount of the credit determined under 1 section 425.23, subsection 1 , paragraph âcâ , the amount paid by 2 the director of revenue to each county treasurer for credits 3 for claimants described under section 425.17, subsection 2 , 4 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3), shall not exceed the amount 5 calculated for the claimant under section 425.23, subsection 1 , 6 paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (1), and section 25B.7, subsection 7 1 , shall not apply to the amount of the credit in excess of the 8 amount paid by the director of revenue. 9 Sec. 10. APPLICABILITY. The section of this division 10 of this Act amending section 425.17 applies to claims under 11 chapter 425, subchapter II, filed on or after January 1, 2027. 12 DIVISION IV 13 RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY TAX REBATE 14 Sec. 11. Section 8.57E, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 15 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Except as otherwise provided in this section , moneys 17 in the taxpayer relief fund shall only be used pursuant to 18 appropriations or transfers made by the general assembly for 19 tax relief , or reductions in income tax rates , or rebates under 20 section 425B.1 . 21 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 425B.1 Residential rebate ââ fund 22 ââ appropriation. 23 1. As used in this section, âeligibility periodâ means each 24 fiscal year commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 25 2026, but before the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028. 26 2. a. A residential rebate fund is created within the 27 state treasury under the control of the department of revenue. 28 For each fiscal year in the eligibility period, there is 29 appropriated from the taxpayer relief fund under section 8.57E 30 to the department of revenue to be credited to the residential 31 rebate fund, an amount sufficient to implement this chapter for 32 the applicable fiscal year. The department of revenue shall 33 determine the annual appropriation amount. 34 b. Moneys in fund are to be used during the eligibility 35 -4- LSB 5443YH (10) 91 md/jh 4/ 12 H.F. 2223 period to provide residential rebate payments annually to 1 qualified persons as described in this section. 2 3. a. A person owning a homestead qualifies to claim 3 a residential rebate in the amount of one thousand dollars 4 for each fiscal year of the eligibility period the person 5 claimed the homestead credit under chapter 425, in the previous 6 fiscal year. Only one rebate may be claimed for a particular 7 homestead per fiscal year. 8 b. The department shall use homestead property tax credit 9 records from county treasurers to identify and pay residential 10 rebates to qualified owners under this subsection. 11 4. a. A person renting a residence qualifies to claim a 12 residential rebate in the amount of five hundred dollars if the 13 residence is the personâs primary residence. Not more than two 14 rebates may be claimed for a particular rented residence per 15 fiscal year and not more than one rebate may be claimed per 16 familial household per fiscal year. 17 b. A person who wishes to qualify for the residential 18 rebate allowed under this chapter as a renter shall obtain the 19 appropriate forms for claiming the rebate from the department 20 of revenue. The person claiming the rebate shall file a claim 21 form, including a verified statement and designation of primary 22 residence, with the department of revenue for the year for 23 which the person is claiming the rebate. The claim shall be 24 filed no later than September 1 following the fiscal year for 25 which the person is claiming the rebate. 26 5. By January 1 following each fiscal year during the 27 eligibility period, the department of revenue shall make the 28 authorized rebate payments to persons who qualify for the 29 rebate under this chapter. 30 DIVISION V 31 RETIREMENT SYSTEMS 32 Sec. 13. Section 97A.1, subsection 10, Code 2026, is amended 33 to read as follows: 34 10. âEarnable compensationâ or âcompensation earnableâ 35 -5- LSB 5443YH (10) 91 md/jh 5/ 12 H.F. 2223 shall mean the regular compensation which a member would 1 earn during one year on the basis of the stated compensation 2 for the memberâs rank or position including compensation for 3 longevity , any amount received for overtime compensation, 4 and the daily amount received for meals under section 80.6 , 5 and excluding any amount received for overtime compensation 6 or other special additional compensation, other payments for 7 meal expenses, uniform cleaning allowances, travel expenses, 8 and uniform allowances and excluding any amount received upon 9 termination or retirement in payment for accumulated sick leave 10 or vacation. 11 Sec. 14. Section 97B.11, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 1. a. Each employer shall deduct from the wages of each 14 member of the retirement system a contribution in the amount of 15 the applicable employee percentage of the covered wages paid by 16 the employer and such additional amount if otherwise required 17 by law, until the memberâs termination from employment. The 18 contributions of the employer shall be in the amount of the 19 applicable employer percentage of the covered wages of the 20 member and such additional amount if otherwise required by law. 21 b. Beginning July 1, 2026, the contributions of the 22 employer related to a member that is in special service in a 23 protection occupation as described in section 97B.49C for a 24 county or as a county sheriff or deputy sheriff as described 25 in section 97B.49C, shall be paid by the treasurer of state 26 from the general fund of the state. For the fiscal year 27 beginning July 1, 2026, and for each fiscal year thereafter, 28 there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to 29 the treasurer of state an amount necessary to carry out the 30 provision of this paragraph. 31 Sec. 15. Section 411.1, subsection 10, Code 2026, is amended 32 to read as follows: 33 10. âEarnable compensationâ or âcompensation earnableâ 34 shall mean the annual compensation which a member receives 35 -6- LSB 5443YH (10) 91 md/jh 6/ 12 H.F. 2223 for services rendered as a police officer or fire fighter in 1 the course of employment with a participating city and shall 2 include any amount received as overtime compensation . However, 3 the term âearnable compensationâ or âcompensation earnableâ shall 4 not include amounts received for overtime compensation, meal or 5 travel expenses, uniform allowances, fringe benefits, severance 6 pay, or any amount received upon termination or retirement in 7 payment for accumulated sick leave or vacation. Contributions 8 made by a member from the memberâs earnable compensation to a 9 plan of deferred compensation shall be included in earnable 10 compensation. Other contributions made to a plan of deferred 11 compensation shall not be included except to the extent 12 provided in rules adopted by the board of trustees pursuant to 13 section 411.5, subsection 3 . 14 Sec. 16. Section 411.8, subsection 1, paragraphs a, b, c, 15 and d, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 16 a. On account of each member there shall be paid annually 17 into the fund by the participating cities or, on or after July 18 1, 2026, by the treasurer of state an amount equal to a certain 19 percentage of the earnable compensation of the member to be 20 known as the ânormal contributionâ. The rate percent of such 21 contribution shall be fixed on the basis of the liabilities of 22 the retirement system as shown by annual actuarial valuations. 23 Beginning July 1, 2026, that portion of the normal contribution 24 otherwise required to be paid by a participating city into the 25 fund shall be paid by the treasurer of state from the general 26 fund of the state. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, 27 and for each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from 28 the general fund of the state to the treasurer of state an 29 amount necessary to carry out the provision of this paragraph 30 âaâ . 31 b. (1) On the basis of the actuarial methods and 32 assumptions, rate of interest, and of the mortality, 33 interest and other tables adopted by the system, the actuary 34 engaged by the system to make each valuation required by 35 -7- LSB 5443YH (10) 91 md/jh 7/ 12 H.F. 2223 this chapter pursuant to the requirements of section 411.5 , 1 shall immediately after making such valuation, determine 2 the normal contribution rate. Except as otherwise provided 3 in this lettered paragraph, the ânormal contribution rateâ 4 shall be the rate percent of the earnable compensation of all 5 members equal to the rate required by the system to discharge 6 its liabilities, stated as a percentage of the earnable 7 compensation of all members, and reduced by the employee 8 contribution rate provided in paragraph âfâ of this subsection 9 and the contribution rate representing any state appropriation 10 made . However, the normal contribution rate shall not be less 11 than seventeen percent. 12 (2) The normal contribution rate shall be determined by the 13 actuary after each valuation. 14 c. The total amount payable in each year to the fund 15 shall be not less than the rate percent known as the normal 16 contribution rate of the total compensation earnable by all 17 members during the year, but the aggregate payment by the 18 participating cities or treasurer of state, as applicable, must 19 be sufficient when combined with the amount in the fund to 20 provide the pensions and other benefits payable out of the fund 21 during the then current year. 22 d. All lump-sum death benefits on account of death in active 23 service payable from contributions of the said participating 24 cities or the treasurer of state, as applicable, shall be paid 25 from the fund. 26